Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1580.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Workplace Heat Protection Standards Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acclimatization." The adaptation of the body to work in high temperatures as the body is exposed to heat gradually over time, reducing the strain caused by heat stress and enabling an individual to work with less chance of developing a heat-related 12345678910111213141516171819 injury or heat-related illness."Alternative cooling and control measure." Engineering, work-practice, administrative or other controls to manage heat, including job rotation, mechanical ventilation systems, misting equipment, cooling vests, air-cooled or water-cooled garments and access to water."Authorized employee representative." The following:(1) an employee authorized by employees or the designated representative of an employee organization recognized or certified to represent the employees; or(2) a person designated by employees for the purpose of enhancing the effectiveness of an inspection, including safety and health expertise, language proficiency or cultural competency."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employ." To engage, suffer or permit to work. A worker is considered an employee and not an independent contractor, unless all of the following conditions are met:(1) the worker is free from the control and direction of the employer in connection with the performance of the work;(2) the worker performs work that is outside the usual course of the employer's business; and(3) the worker is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed."Employee." Any person employed by an employer."Employer." The Commonwealth, its political subdivisions and their instrumentalities or any person, association, entity, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability 20250HB1580PN2251 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 company or corporation who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises any control over the wages, hours or working conditions of any employee."Heat index." A measurement of heat perception when relative humidity is taken into account with actual air temperature, which can be extrapolated from temperature and relative humidity using the National Weather Service Heat Index."Heat stress." The net load to which a worker is exposed from the combined contributions of metabolic heat, environmental factors, physical exertion, heat generating processes, machinery and equipment and clothing worn which results in an increase in heat storage in the body, causing body temperature to rise to dangerous levels."Heat-related illness." A medical condition resulting from the inability of the body to rid itself of excess heat, including heat rash, heat cramps, heat edema, heat exhaustion, heat syncope, rhabdomyolysis and heat stroke."Heat-related injury." An injury that results from impaired cognitive, perceptual and motor functions caused by a heat-related illness."High-heat condition." For outdoor and indoor places of employment, a heat index that equals or exceeds 80º Fahrenheit."Personal protective equipment." Equipment worn to protect an employee against heat stress, heat-related injury or heat-related illness, including water-cooled garments, air-cooled garments, heat reflective clothing or cooling vests."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth or a designated agent."Workplace." A place in or about which an employee is allowed to perform work-related duties.20250HB1580PN2251 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Heat protection standards.No later than one year after the effective date of this section, the secretary shall promulgate regulations to require employers to protect employees from heat-related injury or heat-related illness caused by heat stress. When developing regulations required under this section, the secretary may consider the standards and proposed standards created by the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration, National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists, American National Standards Institute, Maryland Occupational Safety and Health Division, Oregon Occupational Safety and Health Administration and California Division of Occupational Safety and Health.Section 4. Application.(a) Applicability and enforcement.--(1) This act shall apply to all employers.(2) The secretary shall have authority to enforce the regulations promulgated in accordance with the provisions of this act.(b) Exception.--This act shall not apply to the following employees or work-related duties, unless work is performed during nonemergency situations:(1) Emergency response providers as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity).(2) Fire service as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7412 (relating to definitions).(3) Disaster emergency-related work as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7102 (relating to definitions), except if work-20250HB1580PN2251 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related activities are performed for five or more consecutive days.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede or in any manner affect any workers' compensation law or to enlarge, diminish or affect in any manner common law or statutory rights, duties or liabilities of employers or employees under any law with respect to injuries, disease or death of employees arising out of an in the course of employment.Section 5. Regulations.(a) Duties of secretary.--The secretary shall incorporate the requirements provided under this section into the regulations promulgated under section 3. The secretary may update or modify the regulations promulgated under section 3 as deemed necessary to protect employees from heat-related injury or heat-related illness.(b) Notice.--In accordance with the secretary's regulations, an employer shall post a notice in a conspicuous location within the workplace to ensure employees are informed of their protections and obligations under this act, including the provisions and regulations of this act. If at least 5% of the employer's workforce speaks a language other than English, the employer shall post the notice in the language spoken by each language-distinct group of employees that constitutes at least 5% of the total workforce.(c) Heat-related injury and heat-related illness prevention plan.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer to develop, implement and maintain an effective worksite heat-related injury and heat-related illness prevention plan. An employer may consider the input of employees or 20250HB1580PN2251 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized employee representatives. The employer shall make the plan available in writing to all employees, including in the languages spoken by at least 5% of employees. An employer shall be required to conduct an annual review of the plan to determine whether revisions are necessary. The plan shall, at a minimum, contain procedures and methods, including the following:(1) Initial and regular heat index monitoring for employee exposure to heat and determining whether an employee is exposed to high-heat conditions.(2) Providing suitably cool potable water and other hydration as deemed appropriate at no cost to the employee during high-heat conditions.(3) Providing paid rest breaks and access to shade, cool-down areas or climate-controlled spaces at the worksite during high-heat conditions.(4) Identifying and responding to suspected symptoms of heat-related injury or heat-related illness, including heat exhaustion and heat stroke.(5) Providing sufficient time and space to rest in shaded or cool, climate-controlled areas during high-heat conditions, at no cost to the employee.(6) Implementing rest break schedules as necessary to reduce exposure to high-heat conditions.(7) Precautions for employees who have notified the employer of the employee's preexisting risk or greater likelihood of developing a heat-related injury or heat-related illness.(8) Consideration of environmental conditions, workload, indoor radiant heat sources, required clothing, personal protective equipment and alternative cooling and controlling 20250HB1580PN2251 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 measures when determining rest break schedules.(9) Providing paid employee training on the hazards of heat exposure and the necessary steps to prevent heat-related injury or heat-related illness.(10) The use of alternative cooling and control measures to manage heat at a worksite during high-heat conditions.(11) Providing an acclimatization plan for new employees in an appropriately hot environment, employees that have not been in the workplace for an extended period and experienced employees during a sudden increase in workload or heat index. The acclimatization plan may be adjusted for specific worksite conditions or employee needs.(12) Implementing additional mandatory and paid preventive heat-related injury and heat-related illness protocols at a heat index that equals or exceeds 90º Fahrenheit.(13) Implementing a heat alert program for outdoor and indoor non-climate-controlled environments to provide notification to employees when the National Weather Service forecasts high-heat conditions. Upon receiving notification, the employer shall take the following precautions:(i) Postponing non-essential tasks until the high-heat condition subsides.(ii) Instituting paid rest breaks.(iii) Encouraging employees to drink water and electrolytes to remain hydrated.(iv) Instituting supervisor or buddy systems for observing signs and symptoms of heat-related illness.(v) Regular monitoring of the heat index at job sites and resting places to the extent practicable.20250HB1580PN2251 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) Developing a heat emergency response plan that provides an emergency response for an employee who has suffered an injury due to exposure to high-heat conditions and for an employee who is experiencing signs and symptoms of heat-related illness.(15) Limiting the length of time an employee may be exposed to high heat during the work day.(16) Implementing communications systems so that employees may contact their employer directly if the employee is experiencing symptoms of a heat-related illness.(17) Providing training for employees and supervisors on an employee's right to make a complaint or seek assistance under this act.(d) Model plan.--No later than one year after the effective date of this section, the department shall develop and publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a model heat-related injury and heat-related illness prevention plan.(e) Employee training.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer to provide annual paid training and education to all employees who may be exposed to high-heat conditions and repeat the training and education within one month of a death or serious injury occurring as a result of high-heat exposure in the workplace. The employee training and education courses shall include the following:(1) The identification of heat-related injury or heat-related illness factors.(2) Signs and symptoms of heat-related injury or heat-related illness.(3) Different types of heat-related injury or heat-related illness.20250HB1580PN2251 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The importance of acclimatization and hydration.(5) Available climate control measures.(6) The need for reporting heat-related injury or heat-related illness symptoms being experienced by an employee.(7) Personal risk factors that may contribute to development of a heat-related illness.(8) Emergency response procedures and procedures that follow a "cool first, transport second" approach based on recommendations by the National Association of EMS Physicians to perform when an employee exhibits signs or reports symptoms of possible heat-related injury or heat-related illness.(9) Employee rights, including information on health risks directly associated with the duties of employment under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 15 (relating to occupational safety and health) and related Federal regulations, a summary of the rights and requirements under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 15 and related Federal regulations and the department regulations promulgated to implement this act.(f) Supervisor training.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer to provide annual paid training and education to supervisors who are tasked with supervising employees who may be exposed to high-heat conditions. The supervisor training and education shall include the following:(1) Proper procedures a supervisor is required to follow under this section regarding the protection of employees exposed to high-heat conditions.(2) Recognizing high-risk situations, including how to monitor weather reports and weather advisories, and how to 20250HB1580PN2251 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 avoid assigning an employee to an area or situation that could predictably risk the safety of the employee.(3) Proper procedures, including emergency response procedures and procedures that follow a "cool first, transport second" approach based on recommendations by the National Association of EMS Physicians.(g) Employer duties.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer to provide training and education under this section to perform the following:(1) Provide each new employee with the paid training and education required under this section at the onset of employment.(2) Repeat training and education within one month of a death or serious injury occurring as a result of high-heat exposure in the workplace.(3) Provide employees with opportunities to ask questions and request additional instruction, clarification, or follow-up.(4) Designate an individual with knowledge of heat-related injury or heat-related illness prevention and the plan required under subsection (c) to provide the annual education and training to employees and supervisors. (h) Record maintenance.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer to maintain records relating to the heat-related injury and heat-related illness prevention plan under subsection (c), the training and education requirements required under this section, data on the heat index measurements performed in the workplace and data on all heat-related injuries, heat-related illnesses and heat-related fatalities that have occurred in the workplace. Each employer 20250HB1580PN2251 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall make the records available upon request at no cost to employees or authorized employee representatives and the secretary.Section 6. Adverse action prohibited.(a) Discrimination or retaliation.--An employer may not discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate in any manner against an employee for the following:(1) Making a complaint to an employer, authorized employee representative, coworker, community organization, before a public hearing or to a Federal or State agency about what the employee believes to be a violation of rights guaranteed under this act.(2) Seeking assistance or intervention regarding heat-related injury or heat-related illness symptoms from the employer, local emergency services or any other Federal or State agency.(3) Refusing to work if the employee reasonably believes the following:(i) an employer has not met the minimum requirements under this act to protect employees from heat-related injury or heat-related illness; or(ii) performing the required work in high-heat conditions may result in a heat-related injury or heat-related illness because sufficient protective measures have not been provided.(4) Exercising any other rights afforded under this act.(b) Action.--An employee who suffers adverse action in violation of this section may bring a private right of action under section 7.Section 7. Private right of action.20250HB1580PN2251 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Employees.--An employee who has been discharged, threatened or has otherwise suffered retaliation, discrimination or other adverse action as result of seeking intervention, refusing to work in unsafe conditions or reporting a violation of this act, may bring a private right of action in a court of common pleas in accordance with established civil procedures of this Commonwealth.(b) Time.--An action under this section must be brought within three years from the date that the employee knew of a violation, retaliation or discrimination.(c) Relief.--If an employee prevails in an action commenced under this section, the employee shall be entitled to the following relief:(1) Where the employee has been discharged or demoted, reinstatement of the employee without a loss in seniority status, if applicable.(2) Where the employee has been discharged or demoted, restitution equal to three times the amount of the employee's lost wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the violation, retaliation or discrimination.(3) Compensatory and punitive damages.(4) Reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action.(5) Other legal and equitable relief the court deems appropriate to make the employee whole.Section 8. Investigative authority.(a) Secretary.--The secretary shall have the authority to investigate any workplace in this Commonwealth in order to ascertain compliance with this act.(b) Right to inspect.--To carry out the purposes of this act, the secretary shall, upon presenting appropriate 20250HB1580PN2251 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credentials to an employer, have the authority to:(1) Enter and inspect the workplace of the employer, including any worksite where employees are performing work, without advance notice, for the purpose of examining and inspecting any records of the employer relating to the question of compliance with this act.(2) Copy any or all records as deemed necessary or appropriate by the secretary during inspection.(3) Question employees or authorized employee representatives, in private, during inspection.(4) Conduct any tests to determine whether a violation has occurred.(5) Require the employer to provide full and correct statements in writing, including sworn statements, regarding compliance with this act as the secretary may deem necessary or appropriate.(c) Denied inspection.--Whenever the secretary, proceeding in accordance with this section, is denied admission to a workplace, the secretary may obtain a warrant to make an inspection or investigation of the workplace and any related worksites from a judge of Commonwealth Court.(d) Persons to accompany secretary.--Subject to the regulations issued by the secretary, a representative of the employer and an authorized employee representative shall be given an opportunity to accompany the secretary during the physical inspection of a workplace for the purposes of aiding the inspection. If there is not an authorized employee representative, the secretary shall consult with a reasonable number of employees concerning exposure to high-heat conditions in the workplace. An employee who accompanies the secretary on 20250HB1580PN2251 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an inspection shall not suffer a reduction in wages as a result of accompanying the secretary.(e) Rules and regulations.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations as the secretary deems necessary to carry out the secretary's responsibilities under this act, including regulations regarding the inspection of an employer's workplace, including any worksite where employees are performing work.Section 9. Collective bargaining agreements.Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish the rights, privileges or remedies of an employee under a collective bargaining agreement.Section 10. Penalties.(a) Noncompliance.--Upon investigation and a determination by the department that an employer failed to comply with the requirements of section 3 or any regulations prescribed under this act, the department may assess an administrative penalty of $1,000 per day until the failure is cured. If the employer does not cure the failure within 10 days, the department may assess an administrative penalty of not more than $15,000 per day for every day exceeding 10 days.(b) Willful or repeated violations.--An employer who willfully or repeatedly violates the requirements of section 3 or any regulations prescribed under this act may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $160,500 for each violation.(c) Violation causing death.--(1) An employer who violates the heat protection standards promulgated under section 3 or any regulations prescribed under this act, which violation caused death to an employee, commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, 20250HB1580PN2251 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $100,000 or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both.(2) If a conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction, the person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $200,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(d) False statements.--A person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation or certification in a record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under this act commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000.(e) Posting requirements.--An employer who violates the posting requirements as prescribed under this act shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $500 for each violation.(f) Refusing entry.--An employer who refuses entry to the secretary while attempting to conduct an investigation or inspection under this act or willfully obstructs an authorized employee representative from carrying out an investigation or inspection commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500.(g) Considerations.--When determining the penalty amount under this section, the secretary shall consider the history of previous violations, the severity of the violation, the good faith of the employer and the size of the employer's business.Section 11. Heat Protection Enforcement Fund.The Heat Protection Enforcement Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. The following shall apply:(1) All fines and penalties collected under section 9 shall be deposited into the Heat Protection Enforcement Fund.20250HB1580PN2251 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Money in the Heat Protection Enforcement Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department to be used for investigations of violations and for the enforcement of this act.Section 12. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the secretary from pursuing Federal or State funding for the purposes of this act.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1580PN2251 - 16 - 12345678910